Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.010

Legislative findings—Insurance benefits not mandated.

The qualifications and practices of counselors in this state are virtually unknown to potential clients. Beyond the regulated practices of psychiatry and psychology, there are a considerable variety of disciplines, theories, and techniques employed by other counselors under a number of differing titles. The legislature recognizes the right of all counselors to practice their skills freely, consistent with the requirements of the public health and safety, as well as the right of individuals to choose which counselors best suit their needs and purposes. This chapter shall not be construed to require or prohibit that individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier, health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies provided by a person registered under this chapter.

[ 2001 c 251 s 17; 1987 c 512 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.